Utah statutes.
41-6a-1619.   Sale of unapproved equipment prohibited -- Trademark or brand name.

(1)  A person shall not sell or offer for sale any equipment or parts that do not comply with the standards adopted under Section 41-6a-1601 including any lamp, reflector, hydraulic brake fluid, seat belt, safety glass, emergency disablement warning device, studded tire, motorcycle helmet, eye protection device for motorists, or red rear bicycle reflector.

(2)  Any equipment described under Subsection (1) or Section 41-6a-1618 or any package containing the equipment shall bear the manufacturer's trademark or brand name unless it complies with identification requirements of the United States Department of Transportation or other federal agencies.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

